process/tex2pdf/hyphen/hyph_la_VA.dic
.i3ar
.i3a2s.
.i3at
.i3eba1
.i3ebá1
.i3em
.i3e2n1d
.i3en2s.
.ie2n1s
.i3en2t.
.ie2n1t
.i3enti1
.i3entu2r.
.ientu1
.i3entí1
.i3entú2r.
.ientú1
.i3era2m.
.iera1
.i3eramu2s.
.ieramu1
.i3eramú2s.
.ieramú1
.i3eran2t.
.iera2n1t
.i3era2s.
.i3era2t.
.i3erati2s.
.ierati1
.i3eratí2s.
.ieratí1
.i3ere.
.iere1
.i3eri2m.
.i1eri1
.i3erimu2s.
.ierimu1
.i3erimú2s.
.ierimú1
.i3erin2t.
.ieri2n1t
.i3eri2s.
.i3eri2t.
.i3eriti2s.
.ieriti1
.i3erití2s.
.ierití1
.i3ero.
.iero1
.i3erun2t.
.ieru1
.ieru2n1t
.i3erá2m.
.ierá1
.i3erámu2s.
.ierámu1
.i3erán2t.
.ierá2n1t
.i3erá2s.
.i3erá2t.
.i3eráti2s.
.ieráti1
.i3eré.
.ieré1
.i3erí2m.
.ierí1
.i3erímu2s.
.ierímu1
.i3erín2t.
.ierí2n1t
.i3erí2s.
.i3erí2t.
.i3eríti2s.
.ieríti1
.i3eró.
.ieró1
.i3erún2t.
.ierú1
.ierú2n1t
.i3e2s.
.i3et
.i3i.
.i3imu2s.
.iimu1
.i3imú2s.
.iimú1
.i3i2s.
.i3isse1
.ii2s1s
.i3issé1
.i3isti.
.i1i1sti1
.i3isti2s.
.i3istí.
.iistí1
.i3istí2s.
.i3i2t.
.i3o.
.i3o2r.
.i3u2n1t
.i3ámini.
.iámi1
.iámini1
.i3ámu1
.i3án2t.
.iá2n1t
.i3ántu2r.
.iántu1
.i3ár
.i3á2s.
.i3át
.i3éba1
.i3ém
.i3é2n1d
.i3én2s.
.ié2n1s
.i3én2t.
.ié2n1t
.i3énti1
.i3éntu2r.
.iéntu1
.i3éra2m.
.iéra1
.i3éramu2s.
.iéramu1
.i3éran2t.
.iéra2n1t
.i3éra2s.
.i3éra2t.
.i3érati2s.
.iérati1
.i3ére.
.iére1
.i3éri2m.
.i1éri1
.i3érimu2s.
.iérimu1
.i3érin2t.
.iéri2n1t
.i3éri2s.
.i3éri2t.
.i3ériti2s.
.iériti1
.i3éro.
.iéro1
.i3érun2t.
.iéru1
.iéru2n1t
.i3é2s.
.i3ét
.i3í.
.i3ímu2s.
.iímu1
.i3í2s.
.i3ísse1
.ií2s1s
.i3ísti.
.i1ísti1
.i3ísti2s.
.i3í2t.
.i3ó.
.i3ó2r.
.i3ú2n1t
.igu3a1
.igu1
.igu3e1
.i1gu3i1
.igu3o1
.igu3u1
.igu3á1
.igu3æ1
.igu3é1
.igu3í1
.igu3ó1
.igu3ú1
.igu3ǽ1
.igú3a1
.igú1
.igú3e1
.i1gú3i1
.igú3o1
.igú3u1
.igú3æ1
.langu3er
.la1
.la2n1g
.langu2e1
.langu1
.langu3i.
.langu2i1
.langu3im
.langu3is
.langu3i2t.
.langu3ér
.langu2é1
.langu3í.
.langu2í1
.langu3ím
.langu3ís
.langu3í2t.
.langu4e1re1
.langu4eré1
.langu4ére1
.langú3er
.langú1
.langúe1
.langú3i.
.langúi1
.langú3im
.langú3is
.langú3i2t.
.lángu3er
.lá1
.lá2n1g
.lángu2e1
.lángu1
.lángu3i.
.lángu2i1
.lángu3im
.lángu3is
.lángu3i2t.
.lángu4e1re1
.2m2n
.ne2u.
.ne1
.neu1
.ne2ute2r.
.neute1
.ne2uti1
.ne2utr
.ne2uté2r.
.neuté1
.ne2utí1
.ne2ú.
.neú1
.ne2úte2r.
.neúte1
.ne2úti1
.ne2útr
.né2u.
.né1
.néu1
.né2ute2r.
.néute1
.né2uti1
.né2utr
.p2pe.
.2p1p
.ppe1
.p2pé.
.ppé1
.2p2t
.pigu3e1
.pi1
.pigu1
.pi1gu3i1
.pigu3é1
.pigu3í1
.pigú3e1
.pigú1
.pi1gú3i1
.pro2i2n.
.pro1
.proi1
.pro2inde.
.proi2n1d
.proinde1
.pro2indé.
.proindé1
.pro2í2n.
.proí1
.pro2índe.
.proí2n1d
.proínde1
.pró2i2n.
.pró1
.prói1
.pró2inde.
.prói2n1d
.próinde1
.pígu3e1
.pí1
.pígu1
.pígu3i1
.quo2i.
.qu2
.quo1
.quoi1
.quo2í.
.quoí1
.quó2i.
.quó1
.quói1
.qúo2i.
.qú2
.qúo1
.qúoi1
.rigu3a1
.ri1
.rigu1
.rigu3e1
.ri1gu3i1
.rigu3o1
.rigu3u1
.rigu3á1
.rigu3æ1
.rigu3é1
.rigu3í1
.rigu3ó1
.rigu3ú1
.rigu3ǽ1
.rigú3a1
.rigú1
.rigú3e1
.ri1gú3i1
.rigú3o1
.rigú3u1
.rigú3æ1
.rígu3a1
.rí1
.rígu1
.rígu3e1
.rígu3i1
.rígu3o1
.rígu3u1
.rígu3æ1
.se2u.
.se1
.seu1
.se2ú.
.seú1
.sé2u.
.sé1
.séu1
.tigu3a1
.ti1
.tigu1
.tigu3e1
.ti1gu3i1
.tigu3o1
.tigu3u1
.tigu3á1
.tigu3æ1
.tigu3é1
.tigu3í1
.tigu3ó1
.tigu3ú1
.tigu3ǽ1
.tigú3a1
.tigú1
.tigú3e1
.ti1gú3i1
.tigú3o1
.tigú3u1
.tigú3æ1
.tri1ti1cei3
.tri1
.tri1ti1
.tritice1
.triticei4s.
.triticeí3
.triticeí4s.
.tri1ti1céi3
.triticé1
.triticéi4s.
.tri1tícei3
.trití1
.tritíce1
.tritícei4s.
.tríti1cei3
.trí1
.tríti1
.trítice1
.tríticei4s.
.tígu3a1
.tí1
.tígu1
.tígu3e1
.tígu3i1
.tígu3o1
.tígu3u1
.tígu3æ1
.ustui3
.u1
.u1stu1
.ustuí3
.ustúi3
.ustú1
.vigu3e1
.vi1
.vigu1
.vi1gu3i1
.vigu3é1
.vigu3í1
.vigú3e1
.vigú1
.vi1gú3i1
.vígu3e1
.ví1
.vígu1
.vígu3i1
.áccei3
.á1
.á2c1c
.ácce1
.álgu3i.
.á2l1g
.álgu2i1
.álgu1
.álicu2i.
.áli1
.álicu1
.álicui1
.áliquo2i.
.áliqu2
.áliquo1
.áliquoi1
.ám2b1ia2m.
.á2m1b
.ámbi1
.ámbia1
.ám2b1ie1nte1
.ámbie1
.ámbie2n1t
.ám2b1ist
.árgu3a1
.á2r1g
.árgu1
.árgu3e1
.árgu3i1
.árgu3o1
.árgu3u1
.é2uge.
.é1
.éu1
.éuge1
.égu3e1
.égu1
.égu3i1
.éhe2u.
.éhe1
.éheu1
.érgu3a1
.é2r1g
.érgu1
.érgu3e1
.érgu3i1
.érgu3o1
.érgu3u1
.í3amini.
.í1
.ía1
.íami1
.íamini1
.í3amu1
.í3an2t.
.ía2n1t
.í3antu2r.
.íantu1
.í3ar
.í3a2s.
.í3at
.í3eba1
.íe1
.í3em
.í3e2n1d
.í3en2s.
.íe2n1s
.í3en2t.
.íe2n1t
.í3enti1
.í3entu2r.
.íentu1
.í3era2m.
.íera1
.í3eramu2s.
.íeramu1
.í3eran2t.
.íera2n1t
.í3era2s.
.í3era2t.
.í3erati2s.
.íerati1
.í3ere.
.íere1
.í3eri2m.
.íeri1
.í3erimu2s.
.íerimu1
.í3erin2t.
.íeri2n1t
.í3eri2s.
.í3eri2t.
.í3eriti2s.
.íeriti1
.í3ero.
.íero1
.í3erun2t.
.íeru1
.íeru2n1t
.í3e2s.
.í3et
.í3i.
.íi1
.í3imu2s.
.íimu1
.í3i2s.
.í3isse1
.íi2s1s
.í3isti.
.íi1sti1
.í3isti2s.
.í3i2t.
.í3o.
.ío1
.í3o2r.
.í3u2n1t
.íu1
.ígu3a1
.ígu1
.ígu3e1
.ígu3i1
.ígu3o1
.ígu3u1
.ígu3æ1
.ústui3
.ú1
.ústu1
2b.
2b1b
2b1t
2b2s.
2c.
2c1c
2c1d
2c1p
2c1q
2c1t
2c2h.
2d.
2d1c
2d1d
2d1q
2d1s
2d1v
2d2r.
2f.
2f1f
2g.
2g1g
2g1m
2g2n.
2h.
2l.
2l1b
2l1c
2l1d
2l1f
2l1g
2l1l
2l1m
2l1n
2l1p
2l1q
2l1r
2l1s
2l1t
2l1v
2l1x
2l1z
2m.
2m1b
2m1c
2m1d
2m1f
2m1g
2m1h
2m1l
2m1m
2m1n
2m1p
2m1q
2m1r
2m1s
2m1t
2m1v
2m1x
2m1z
2n.
2n1b
2n1c
2n1d
2n1f
2n1g
2n1h
2n1l
2n1m
2n1n
2n1p
2n1q
2n1r
2n1s
2n1t
2n1v
2n1x
2n1z
2p.
2p1p
2p1t
2p2h.
2p2s.
2r.
2r1b
2r1c
2r1d
2r1f
2r1g
2r1l
2r1m
2r1n
2r1p
2r1q
2r1r
2r1s
2r1t
2r1v
2r1x
2r1z
2s.
2s1d
2s1s
2s1v
2s2c.
2s2h.
2s2t.
2t.
2t1c
2t1d
2t1f
2t1n
2t1p
2t1q
2t1s
2t1t
2t1v
2t2h.
2t2r.
2x.
2x1b
2x1c
2x1d
2x1f
2x1g
2x1h
2x1l
2x1m
2x1n
2x1p
2x1q
2x1r
2x1s
2x1t
2x1v
2z.
2z1z
a1
a2u1
a2ú1
a1i2a1
ai1
ai2e1
ai2i1
ai2o1
ai2u1
ai2á1
ai2æ1
ai2é1
ai2í1
ai2ó1
ai2ú1
ai2ǽ1
e1
ei2a1
ei1
e1i2e1
ei2i1
ei2o1
ei2u1
ei2á1
ei2æ1
ei2é1
ei2í1
ei2ó1
ei2ú1
ei2ǽ1
gu2a1
gu1
gu2e1
gu2i1
gu2o1
gu2u1
gu2á1
gu2æ1
gu2é1
gu2í1
gu2ó1
gu2ú1
gu2ǽ1
gui3a1
gui3e1
gui3i1
gui3o1
gu1i3u1
gui3á1
gui3æ1
gui3é1
gui3í1
gui3ó1
gui3ú1
gui3ǽ1
guí3a1
guí3e1
guí3i1
guí3o1
gu1í3u1
guí3æ1
gúi3a1
gú1
gúi1
gúi3e1
gúi3i1
gúi3o1
gúi3u1
gúi3æ1
i1
ii2a1
i1i1
ii2e1
ii2o1
ii2u1
ii2á1
ii2æ1
ii2é1
ii2ó1
ii2ú1
ii2ǽ1
o1
oi2a1
oi1
oi2e1
oi2i1
o1i2o1
oi2u1
oi2á1
oi2æ1
oi2é1
oi2í1
oi2ó1
oi2ú1
oi2ǽ1
qu2
qui3a1
qui1
qui3e1
qui3i1
qui3o1
qu1i3u1
qui3á1
qui3æ1
qui3é1
qui3í1
qui3ó1
qui3ú1
qui3ǽ1
quí3a1
quí1
quí3e1
quí3i1
quí3o1
qu1í3u1
quí3æ1
qú2
qúi3a1
qúi1
qúi3e1
qúi3i1
qúi3o1
qúi3u1
qúi3æ1
u1
ui2a1
ui1
ui2e1
ui2i1
ui2o1
u1i2u1
ui2á1
ui2æ1
ui2é1
ui2í1
ui2ó1
ui2ú1
ui2ǽ1
y1
yi2a1
yi1
yi2e1
yi2i1
yi2o1
yi2u1
yi2á1
yi2æ1
yi2é1
yi2í1
yi2ó1
yi2ú1
yi2ǽ1
á1
á2u1
ái2a1
ái1
ái2e1
ái2i1
ái2o1
ái2u1
ái2æ1
æ1
æi2a1
æi1
æi2e1
æi2i1
æi2o1
æi2u1
æi2á1
æ1i2æ1
æi2é1
æi2í1
æi2ó1
æi2ú1
æi2ǽ1
é1
éi2a1
éi1
éi2e1
éi2i1
éi2o1
éi2u1
éi2æ1
í1
íi2a1
íi1
íi2e1
íi2o1
íi2u1
íi2æ1
ó1
ói2a1
ói1
ói2e1
ói2i1
ói2o1
ói2u1
ói2æ1
ú1
úi2a1
úi1
úi2e1
úi2i1
úi2o1
úi2u1
úi2æ1
ý1
ýi2a1
ýi1
ýi2e1
ýi2i1
ýi2o1
ýi2u1
ýi2æ1
œ1
œi2a1
œi1
œi2e1
œi2i1
œi2o1
œi2u1
œi2á1
œi2æ1
œi2é1
œi2í1
œi2ó1
œi2ú1
œi2ǽ1
ǽ1
ǽi2a1
ǽi1
ǽi2e1
ǽi2i1
ǽi2o1
ǽi2u1
ǽi2æ1
